Utah statutes.
53A-17a-151.   Board leeway for reading improvement.

(1)  Each local school board may levy a tax rate of up to .000121 per dollar of taxable value for funding the school district's K-3 Reading Improvement Program created under Section 53A-17a-150.

(2)  The levy authorized under this section:

(a)  is in addition to any other levy or maximum rate;

(b)  does not require voter approval; and

(c)  may be modified or terminated by a majority vote of the board.

(3)  A local school board shall establish its board-approved levy under this section by June 1 to have the levy apply to the fiscal year beginning July 1 in that same calendar year.

